District of Columbia statutes.
2-1207.06a

Repealed

Business Purchase Assistance Program.

Repealed.

June 29, 1984, D.C. Law 5-89, § 7a
as added Dec. 21, 1985, D.C. Law 6-74, § 2, 32 DCR 6475
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-213, § 7, 49 DCR 8140
1981 Ed., § 1-2223.
Transfer of powers, duties, and responsibilities from Board of Directors of Economic Development Finance Corporation: Section 30(b) of D.C. Law 12-144 provided for the transfer of the powers, duties, and responsibilities of the Board of Directors of the Economic Development Finance Corporation to the Board of Directors of the National Capital Revitalization Corporation, and for the abolition of the Board of Directors of the Economic Development Finance Corporation.